New Jersey, session 222, S754.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Civil Service Commission shall establish a two-year pilot program that permits counties and municipalities to appoint persons through a streamlined hiring process for certain positions in the Civil Service, as further provided in this section.  The purpose of the pilot program shall be to streamline the hiring process for certain positions and to reduce the timeframe between the request to fill a vacancy and the hiring of a qualified candidate. b.  The Chair of the Civil Service Commission shall establish the scope of the pilot program and the policies and procedures for the selection of counties and municipalities eligible to participate in the pilot program.  In selecting the counties and municipalities to participate in the pilot program, the chair shall consider the needs of the county or municipality, as appropriate. c.  Participation by any eligible county or municipality in the pilot program shall be voluntary.  A county or municipality that wants to participate shall submit an application to the Civil Service Commission in such form as required by the commission.  The county or municipality, as part of the application, shall include information on their hiring needs, including the number of positions and the rate of turnover in the positions, and such other information as required by the commission. d.  The commission shall select counties and municipalities in the northern, central, and southern regions of the State; a cross section of urban, suburban, and rural areas; a cross section of counties and cities of various classes; and a diverse representation of forms of government. e.  Under the pilot program, the chair shall establish the positions, policies, and procedures for the counties and municipalities participating in the pilot program to appoint persons through the streamlined hiring process.  Such policies and procedures may include, but may not be limited to, permitting the counties and municipalities to post the vacancy to be filled and to administer the examination with the approval of the commission. The commission shall create the examinations.  After administration of the examination by the county or municipality, as appropriate, the examination shall immediately be submitted to the commission for review and completion of the certification process. f.  Upon completion of the certification process, the county or municipality, as appropriate, shall be permitted to hire a qualified candidate.  The county or municipality, as appropriate, with the written authorization of the Chair of the Civil Service Commission, or a designee, shall sign a waiver designed and authorized by the commission exempting the candidate from the civil service hiring process. g.  Upon accepting the appointment, the candidate shall satisfactorily complete the working test period to be considered by the commission as qualified for the position and to have civil service status. h.  The commission shall not require the county or municipality, as appropriate, to replace the candidate hired through the streamlined process established by this section, upon the issuance of a subsequent certified eligible list.  This provision shall apply regardless of whether or not the candidate is listed on the certified eligible list. i.  As used in this section: Municipality means and includes cities, towns, townships, villages, and boroughs. j.  The Civil Service Commission shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this act. k.  Two years following the establishment of the pilot program, the commission shall submit a report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1).  The report shall contain information on the implementation of the pilot program and the recommendations of the commission on the advisability of continuing, expanding, or modifying the program. 2.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment, except that the Civil Service Commission may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.